test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taeuzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - täuž: # nouns 112 '(eng) full / (est) täis / (fin) täysi' 
    täuž+N+Sg+Nom: täuž
    täuž+N+Sg+Gen: täud
    täuž+N+Sg+Par: tǟta
    täuž+N+Sg+Dat: täudõn
    täuž+N+Sg+Ins: täudkõks
    täuž+N+Sg+Ill: täudõ
    täuž+N+Sg+Ela: täudstõ
    täuž+N+Pl+Nom: tǟdõd
    täuž+N+Pl+Gen: tǟdõd
    täuž+N+Pl+Par: täuži
    täuž+N+Pl+Dat: tǟdõdõn
    täuž+N+Pl+Ins: tǟdõdõks
    täuž+N+Pl+Ill: täužiz
    täuž+N+Pl+Ela: täužist
